Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.038

License required of persons dealing in livestock, hay, grain, or straw.

Any person who deals in livestock, hay, grain or straw, other than the producer or grower thereof, shall license as a dealer or commission merchant and shall be subject to all the provisions of this chapter regulating such a licensee.

[ 1963 c 232 s 9.]